apertium-sqi.sqi.dix
    <pardef n="shp/ie__vblex" c="Class Irregular"> 
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ura</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ure</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uri</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>utë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ija</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ije</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inte</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>init</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inin</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ihem</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihe</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihet</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihemi</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheti</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihen</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ura</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ure</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>utë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ihesha</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheshe</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihej</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheshim</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheshit</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheshin</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iesh</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jerë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ënça</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënç</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>entë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënçim</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënçit</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënçin</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>ufsha</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ufsh</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uftë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ufshim</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ufshit</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ufshin</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ënkam</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënke</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënka</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënkemi</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënkeni</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënkan</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ënkësha</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënkëshe</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënkësh</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënkëshim</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënkëshit</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ënkëshin</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>jer</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>urë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urë</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urët</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urët</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urët</l><r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="shpie"><i>shp</i><par n="shp/ie__vblex"/></e>
